test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_kolliistallam_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kolliistâllâm: 
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Nom:  kolliistâllâm
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Gen:  kolliistâllâm
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Acc:  kolliistâllâm
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Ill:  kolliistâlmân
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Loc:  kolliistâlmist
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Com:  kolliistâlmáin
    kolliistâllâm+N+Sg+Abe:  kolliistâllâmttáá
    kolliistâllâm+N+Ess:  kolliistâlmin
    kolliistâllâm+N+Par:  kolliistâlmid
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Nom:  kolliistâlmeh
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Gen:  kolliistâlmij
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Acc:  kolliistâlmijd
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Ill:  kolliistâlmáid
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Loc:  kolliistâlmijn
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Com:  [kolliistâlmijguin, kolliistâlmijgijn]
    kolliistâllâm+N+Pl+Abe:  kolliistâlmijttáá
    
  Noun - heiviittâllâm: 
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Nom:  heiviittâllâm
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Gen:  heiviittâllâm
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Acc:  heiviittâllâm
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Ill:  heiviittâlmân
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Loc:  heiviittâlmist
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Com:  heiviittâlmáin
    heiviittâllâm+N+Sg+Abe:  heiviittâllâmttáá
    heiviittâllâm+N+Ess:  heiviittâlmin
    heiviittâllâm+N+Par:  heiviittâlmid
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Nom:  heiviittâlmeh
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Gen:  heiviittâlmij
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Acc:  heiviittâlmijd
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Ill:  heiviittâlmáid
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Loc:  heiviittâlmijn
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Com:  [heiviittâlmijguin, heiviittâlmijgijn]
    heiviittâllâm+N+Pl+Abe:  heiviittâlmijttáá   
